District of Columbia statutes.
7-2509.10

Penalties.

(a)

(1)

Except as otherwise provided in this subchapter, a person convicted of a violation of a provision of this subchapter, or rules or regulations issued under the authority of this subchapter, shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, or imprisoned for not more than 180 days.

(2)

Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this subchapter, or any rules or regulations issued under the authority of this subchapter.

(b)

All prosecutions for violations of this subchapter shall be brought in the name of the District of Columbia and prosecuted by the Office of the Attorney General for the District of Columbia.

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, § 910
as added June 16, 2015, D.C. Law 20-279, § 2(f), 62 DCR 1944

History